Maine, session 132, LD376.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3174-PPP is enacted to read:
§3174-PPP. Reimbursement for doula services
1. Definition. For purposes of this section, "doula services" means the provision of
services by a nonclinical professional related to the physical, emotional and informational
support of pregnant persons before, during and after childbirth, including, but not limited
to, guidance and support around pregnancy health, childbirth, breastfeeding and newborn
care.
2. Reimbursement. Beginning January 1, 2026, the department shall provide
reimbursement under the MaineCare program for doula services, including, but not limited
to, a maximum of 4 prenatal and 4 postnatal visits with a nonclinical professional providing
doula services.
3. Rulemaking. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined by Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2‑A.